Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 58

Eligibility Verification for Entitlements Act

4-58-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Eligibility Verification for Entitlements Act.”

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 3 provided that all affected state governmental entities are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which enacted this chapter. All rules and regulations promulgated by a state governmental entity shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 5 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall apply to all applications for benefits submitted to state governmental entities or local health departments on or after October 1, 2012.

4-58-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Federal public benefit”:

Has the same meaning as provided in 8 U.S.C. § 1611; and

Does not mean a benefit listed in 8 U.S.C. § 1611(b);

“Political subdivision” means any local governmental entity, including, but not limited to, any municipality, metropolitan government, county, utility district, school district, public building authority, and development district created and existing pursuant to the laws of this state, or any instrumentality of government created by any one (1) or more of the named local governmental entities;

“Qualified alien” means:

A qualified alien as defined by 8 U.S.C. § 1641(b); or

An alien or nonimmigrant eligible to receive state or local public benefits under 8 U.S.C. § 1621(a);

“SAVE program” means the systematic alien verification for entitlements program created pursuant to the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (8 U.S.C. § 1101 et seq.), and operated by the United States department of homeland security, or any successor program thereto;

“SEVIS system” means the student and exchange visitor information system created pursuant to § 641 of the Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigrant Responsibility Act of 1996, Public Law 104-208 (as amended) (8 USCS § 1372), and operated by the United States department of homeland security, or any successor program thereto;

“State governmental entity”:

Means a state agency, department, board, commission, and other body which carries out state functions and programs; and

Does not mean a political subdivision; and

“State or local public benefit”:

Means any public benefit as defined in 8 U.S.C. § 1621, that is provided or administered by a state governmental entity or a local health department; and

Does not mean a benefit listed in 8 U.S.C. § 1621(b).

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1; 2013, ch. 120, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 3 provided that all affected state governmental entities are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which enacted this chapter. All rules and regulations promulgated by a state governmental entity shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 5 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall apply to all applications for benefits submitted to state governmental entities or local health departments on or after October 1, 2012.

Attorney General Opinions. House Bill 660/Senate Bill 635, 110th Gen. Assem. (2017), which would grant the governing body of each state institution of higher education the authority “to determine the qualifications that students must possess to be eligible for payment of in-state tuition and fees,” would not permit individual state institutions of higher education to make unlawful aliens eligible for in-state tuition. That action would remain prohibited by the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, 8 U.S.C. § 1621. Accordingly, the proposed legislation would not implicate or affect other provisions of federal or state law related to unlawful aliens or postsecondary education benefits, including the Illegal Immigration Reform and Immigrant Responsibility Act of 1996, 8 U.S.C. § 1623, and the Hope Scholarship, and Tennessee Promise programs. OAG 17-53, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (12/6/2017).

The Eligibility Verification for Entitlements Act (EVEA) can be read in harmony with laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or U.S. citizens or resident aliens and therefore did not impliedly repeal those laws. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens also violate the Equal Protection Clause because they discriminate based on alienage and would not satisfy strict scrutiny. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. Laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens do not violate the Equal Protection Clause, however, because they discriminate only against unlawful aliens and lawful aliens who are not permanent residents. Those categories of aliens are not a suspect class, and the laws at issue would likely satisfy rational basis review. The Department of Commerce and Insurance is not required to enforce the requirements that an applicant for licensure, registration, or certification be a “citizen of the United States” or a “citizen of the United States or resident alien.” OAG 18-42, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (9/13/2018).

4-58-103. Verification of citizenship of applicants for benefits.

Except where prohibited by federal law, every state governmental entity and local health department shall verify that each applicant eighteen (18) years of age or older, who applies for a federal, state or local public benefit from the entity or local health department, is a United States citizen or lawfully present in the United States in the manner provided in this chapter.

As provided in subdivision (b)(2), every state governmental entity or local health department shall include on all forms, electronic or otherwise, and all automated phone systems, a written or verbal statement:

Requiring an applicant for a federal, state or local public benefit to, under penalty of perjury, attest to the applicant's status as either:

A United States citizen; or

A qualified alien; and

Describing the penalties for violations of this chapter.

Subdivision (b)(1) shall be implemented upon the entity’s or local health department’s first reprinting of applicable forms or updating of the electronic or automated phone systems, described in subdivision (b)(1), after October 1, 2012.

For an applicant who claims United States citizenship, the entity or local health department shall make every reasonable effort to ascertain verification of the applicant's citizenship, which may include requesting the applicant to present any one (1) of the following:

A valid Tennessee driver license or photo identification license issued by the department of safety; or

A valid driver license or photo identification license from another state where the issuance requirements are at least as strict as those in Tennessee, as determined by the department of safety;

An official birth certificate issued by a state, jurisdiction or territory of the United States, including Puerto Rico, United States Virgin Islands, Northern Mariana Islands, American Samoa, Swains Island, Guam; provided, that Puerto Rican birth certificates issued before July 1, 2010, shall not be recognized under this subdivision (c)(2);

A United States government-issued certified birth certificate;

A valid, unexpired United States passport;

A United States certificate of birth abroad (DS-1350 or FS-545);

A report of birth abroad of a citizen of the United States (FS-240);

A certificate of citizenship (N560 or N561);

A certificate of naturalization (N550, N570 or N578);

A United States citizen identification card (I-197, I-179);

Any successor document of subdivisions (c)(4)-(9); or

A social security number that the entity or local health department may verify with the social security administration in accordance with federal law.

For an applicant who claims qualified alien status, the applicant shall present two (2) forms of documentation of identity and immigration status, as determined by the United States department of homeland security to be acceptable for verification through the SAVE program; provided, that no entity or local health department is required to verify such applicant’s documents through the SAVE program if two (2) such documents are presented unless otherwise required by federal law.

If an applicant who claims eligibility as a qualified alien is unable to present two (2) forms of documentation as described in subdivision (d)(1), then the applicant shall present at least one (1) such document that the entity or local health department shall then verify through the SAVE program or the SEVIS system.

Each state governmental entity or local health department shall maintain a copy of all documentation submitted by an applicant for verification in a manner consistent with the entity's or local health department's rules, regulations or policies governing storage or preservation of such documentation.

Any document submitted pursuant to subsections (c) or (d) shall be presumed to be proof of an individual's eligibility under this chapter until a final verification is received by the state governmental entity or local health department, and no entity or local health department shall delay the distribution of any federal, state or local benefit based solely on the pendency of final verification.

Upon receipt of a final verification that indicates that the applicant is not a United States citizen or qualified alien, the state governmental entity or local health department shall terminate any recurring benefit, and shall pursue any action applicable against the applicant pursuant to § 4-58-104 or § 4-58-105.

The verification process required by this section shall be enforced without regard to race, religion, gender, ethnicity or national origin.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1; 2013, ch. 120, §§ 2, 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 3 provided that all affected state governmental entities are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which enacted this chapter. All rules and regulations promulgated by a state governmental entity shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 5 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall apply to all applications for benefits submitted to state governmental entities or local health departments on or after October 1, 2012.

Attorney General Opinions. The Eligibility Verification for Entitlements Act (EVEA) can be read in harmony with laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or U.S. citizens or resident aliens and therefore did not impliedly repeal those laws. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens also violate the Equal Protection Clause because they discriminate based on alienage and would not satisfy strict scrutiny. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. Laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens do not violate the Equal Protection Clause, however, because they discriminate only against unlawful aliens and lawful aliens who are not permanent residents. Those categories of aliens are not a suspect class, and the laws at issue would likely satisfy rational basis review. The Department of Commerce and Insurance is not required to enforce the requirements that an applicant for licensure, registration, or certification be a “citizen of the United States” or a “citizen of the United States or resident alien.” OAG 18-42, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (9/13/2018).

4-58-104. Liability for false, fictitious or fraudulent statements or representations.

Any natural person eighteen (18) years of age or older who knowingly and willfully makes a false, fictitious or fraudulent statement or representation under this chapter shall be liable under either:

The Tennessee Medicaid False Claims Act, compiled in §§ 71-5-181 — 71-5-185; or

The False Claims Act, compiled in chapter 18 of this title.

Any natural person who conspires to defraud the state or any local health department by securing a false claim allowed or paid to another person in violation of this chapter shall be liable under § 4-18-103(a)(3).

A state governmental entity or local health department shall file, with the attorney general and reporter of this state, a complaint alleging a violation of subsections (a) or (b), as applicable.

Any moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited with and utilized by the applicable entity or local health department that filed a complaint pursuant to subsection (c). The applicable entity or local health department shall establish a fund for the deposit of such moneys, and shall use such moneys for the sole purpose of enforcing this chapter. Any interest accruing on investments and deposits of the fund shall be credited to such fund, shall not revert to any general fund, and shall be carried forward into each subsequent fiscal year.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 3 provided that all affected state governmental entities are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which enacted this chapter. All rules and regulations promulgated by a state governmental entity shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 5 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall apply to all applications for benefits submitted to state governmental entities or local health departments on or after October 1, 2012.

4-58-105. Filing with United States attorney complaints alleging criminal violations of 18 U.S.C. § 911.

A state governmental entity or local health department shall file, with the United States attorney, a complaint alleging a criminal violation of 18 U.S.C. § 911, for each person who willfully makes a false, fictitious or fraudulent statement or representation of United States citizenship.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 3 provided that all affected state governmental entities are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which enacted this chapter. All rules and regulations promulgated by a state governmental entity shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 5 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall apply to all applications for benefits submitted to state governmental entities or local health departments on or after October 1, 2012.

4-58-106. Violation of chapter prohibited — Report on compliance.

No state governmental entity or local health department shall provide or offer to provide any federal, state or local public benefit in violation of this chapter.

Each entity and local health department, subject to this chapter, shall include in any annual report to the general assembly, as required by law, a report of its compliance with this chapter through June 30 of each year.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 3 provided that all affected state governmental entities are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which enacted this chapter. All rules and regulations promulgated by a state governmental entity shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 5 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall apply to all applications for benefits submitted to state governmental entities or local health departments on or after October 1, 2012.

Attorney General Opinions. The Eligibility Verification for Entitlements Act (EVEA) can be read in harmony with laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or U.S. citizens or resident aliens and therefore did not impliedly repeal those laws. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens also violate the Equal Protection Clause because they discriminate based on alienage and would not satisfy strict scrutiny. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. Laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens do not violate the Equal Protection Clause, however, because they discriminate only against unlawful aliens and lawful aliens who are not permanent residents. Those categories of aliens are not a suspect class, and the laws at issue would likely satisfy rational basis review. The Department of Commerce and Insurance is not required to enforce the requirements that an applicant for licensure, registration, or certification be a “citizen of the United States” or a “citizen of the United States or resident alien.” OAG 18-42, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (9/13/2018).

4-58-107. Sending to or receiving from naturalization service information regarding immigration status of aliens.

Unless otherwise provided by federal law, no state governmental entity or local health department shall be prohibited, or in any way restricted, from sending to or receiving from the immigration and naturalization service information regarding the immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of an alien in the United States.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 3 provided that all affected state governmental entities are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which enacted this chapter. All rules and regulations promulgated by a state governmental entity shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 5 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall apply to all applications for benefits submitted to state governmental entities or local health departments on or after October 1, 2012.

4-58-108. Interpretation consistent with federal and state law.

This chapter shall be interpreted consistently with all federal laws, including, but not limited to, federal laws regulating immigration, labor, and medicaid, and all state laws.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 3 provided that all affected state governmental entities are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which enacted this chapter. All rules and regulations promulgated by a state governmental entity shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 5 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall apply to all applications for benefits submitted to state governmental entities or local health departments on or after October 1, 2012.

Attorney General Opinions. The Eligibility Verification for Entitlements Act (EVEA) can be read in harmony with laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or U.S. citizens or resident aliens and therefore did not impliedly repeal those laws. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens also violate the Equal Protection Clause because they discriminate based on alienage and would not satisfy strict scrutiny. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. Laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens do not violate the Equal Protection Clause, however, because they discriminate only against unlawful aliens and lawful aliens who are not permanent residents. Those categories of aliens are not a suspect class, and the laws at issue would likely satisfy rational basis review. The Department of Commerce and Insurance is not required to enforce the requirements that an applicant for licensure, registration, or certification be a “citizen of the United States” or a “citizen of the United States or resident alien.” OAG 18-42, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (9/13/2018).

4-58-109. No limitation regarding application process — Cost of verification.

Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted as limiting a state governmental entity or local health department regarding its current application process for administering a federal, state or local public benefit, including, but not limited to, requesting additional information from the applicant or requiring additional verification of eligibility.

The state shall defray the cost to a local health department of verifying each applicant's status for a benefit.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 3 provided that all affected state governmental entities are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which enacted this chapter. All rules and regulations promulgated by a state governmental entity shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 5 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall apply to all applications for benefits submitted to state governmental entities or local health departments on or after October 1, 2012.

Attorney General Opinions. The Eligibility Verification for Entitlements Act (EVEA) can be read in harmony with laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or U.S. citizens or resident aliens and therefore did not impliedly repeal those laws. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens also violate the Equal Protection Clause because they discriminate based on alienage and would not satisfy strict scrutiny. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. Laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens do not violate the Equal Protection Clause, however, because they discriminate only against unlawful aliens and lawful aliens who are not permanent residents. Those categories of aliens are not a suspect class, and the laws at issue would likely satisfy rational basis review. The Department of Commerce and Insurance is not required to enforce the requirements that an applicant for licensure, registration, or certification be a “citizen of the United States” or a “citizen of the United States or resident alien.” OAG 18-42, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (9/13/2018).

4-58-110. Limitations on application of chapter.

This chapter shall not apply to:

Any person applying for benefits who:

Lacks the mental capacity to commit perjury under oath; and

Has not been judicially appointed a guardian or conservator;

Legal services provided by a district public defender, court-appointed counsel, or other counsel for indigent services;

Prenatal care administered by the department of health; or

The special supplemental food program for women, infants and children administered by the department of health.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 3 provided that all affected state governmental entities are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which enacted this chapter. All rules and regulations promulgated by a state governmental entity shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 5 provided that the act, which enacted this chapter, shall apply to all applications for benefits submitted to state governmental entities or local health departments on or after October 1, 2012.